Maine, session 132, LD1000.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 5 MRSA §20043, sub-§9 is enacted to read:
9. Discharge. Upon completion of a treatment program, the facility must ensure that
the person is discharged to the care of a responsible adult who the facility has determined
is able to support the person's adjustment to discharge from the treatment program.
Sec. 2. 34-A MRSA §3047, sub-§3, ¶D, as amended by PL 1991, c. 314, §52, is
further amended to read:
D. If the prisoner requests a reasonable place nearer the place of incarceration than
any of the foregoing the places in paragraphs A to C, transportation must be furnished
to that place; or
Sec. 3. 34-A MRSA §3047, sub-§4, as amended by PL 1991, c. 314, §52, is further
amended to read:
4. Extreme circumstances. May, in extreme circumstances, if the prisoner's home is
outside the State, or if the prisoner has secured employment outside the State, furnish
transportation to the prisoner's home or place of employment.; or
Sec. 4. 34-A MRSA §3047, sub-§5 is enacted to read:
5. Support from responsible adult. Shall ensure that the prisoner is released to the
care of a responsible adult who the commissioner has determined is able to support the
prisoner's transition from incarceration.